Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Council" means the student achievement council.

(2) "Degree" means any designation, appellation, letters, or words including but not limited to "associate," "bachelor," "master," "doctor," or "fellow" which signify or purport to signify satisfactory completion of the requirements of an academic program of study beyond the secondary school level.

(3) "Degree-granting institution" means an entity that offers educational credentials, instruction, or services prerequisite to or indicative of an academic or professional degree beyond the secondary level.

[ 2012 c 229 s 542; 1986 c 136 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.